en: Scan Converters
xx: Scan Converters
cs: Převodníky videosignálu
da: Scanningskonvertere
de: Signalwandler
es: Convertidores de barrido
fr: Convertisseurs de balayage
it: Scan converter
ja: スキャンコンバータ
nl: Scanomvormers
no: Signalomformere
pl: Konwertery skanujące
pt: Conversores de scan
ru: Преобразователи развертки
sv: Skanningsomvandlare
tr: Tarama Çeviricileri

en: Electronics Component Connectors
xx: Electronics Component Connectors
cs: Elektrické konektory
da: Forbindelsesstik
de: Steckverbinder
es: Conectores de componentes eléctricos
fr: Connecteurs de composants électroniques
it: Connettori per componenti elettronici
ja: 電子機器用コネクター
nl: Aansluitingen voor elektronische componenten
no: Elektriske komponentkontakter
pl: Konektory
pt: Conectores de componentes eletrônicos
ru: Разъемы для электронных компонентов
sv: Kontakter
tr: Elektronik Bileşen Konektörleri

en: Modulators
xx: Modulators
cs: Modulátory
da: Modulatorer
de: Modulatoren
es: Moduladores
fr: Modulateurs
it: Modulatori
ja: モジュレーター
nl: Modulators
no: Modulatorer
pl: Modulatory
pt: Moduladores
ru: Модуляторы
sv: Modulatorer
tr: Modülatörler

en: Splitters
xx: Splitters
cs: Rozdělovače
da: Fordelere
de: Splitter
es: Duplicadores
fr: Coupleurs
it: Divisori
ja: 分配器
nl: Splitters
no: Splittere
pl: Rozgałęźniki
pt: Divisores de cabos
ru: Разветвители
sv: Splitterkablar
tr: Splitterlar

en: Computers
xx: Computers
cs: Počítače
da: Computere
de: Computer
es: Ordenadores
fr: Ordinateurs, Ordinateur, PC, Matériel informatique
it: Computer
ja: コンピューター
nl: Computers
no: Datamaskiner
pl: Komputery
pt: Computadores
ru: Компьютеры
sv: Datorer
tr: Bilgisayarlar

en: Barebone Computers
xx: Barebone Computers
cs: Počítače barebone
da: Barebonecomputer
de: Barebone-Computer
es: Ordenadores tipo Barebone
fr: PC Barebone
it: Computer Barebone
ja: ベアボーンPC
nl: Barebone computers
no: Barebone-datamaskiner
pl: Komputery typu barebone
pt: Computadores Barebone
ru: Компьютеры Barebone
sv: Barebonedatorer
tr: Temel Bilgisayar Sistemleri

en: Computer Servers
xx: Computer Servers
cs: Počítačové servery
da: Computerservere
de: Computerserver
es: Servidores informáticos
fr: Serveurs informatiques
it: Server
ja: サーバー
nl: Computerservers
no: Servere
pl: Serwery komputerowe
pt: Servidores
ru: Серверы
sv: Datorservrar
tr: Bilgisayar Sunucuları

en: Desktop Computers
xx: Desktop Computers
cs: Stolní počítače
da: Skrivebordscomputere
de: Desktop-Computer
es: Ordenadores de sobremesa
fr: Ordinateurs de bureau
it: Computer desktop
ja: デスクトップPC
nl: Desktopcomputers
no: Stasjonære datamaskiner
pl: Komputery stacjonarne
pt: Computadores desktop
ru: Настольные компьютеры
sv: Stationära datorer
tr: Masaüstü Bilgisayarlar

en: Handheld Devices
xx: Handheld Devices
cs: Přenosná zařízení
da: Håndholdte enheder
de: E-Book-Reader & Handheld-Computer
es: Dispositivos portátiles
fr: Appareils mobiles
it: Dispositivi portatili
ja: 携帯端末
nl: Handheldapparaten
no: Håndholdte enheter
pl: Palmtopy
pt: Dispositivos portáteis
ru: Портативные устройства
sv: Handhållna enheter
tr: Elde Taşınabilir Cihazlar

en: Data Collectors
xx: Data Collectors
cs: Terminály pro sběr dat
da: Datasamlingsterminaler
de: Datenerfassungsgeräte
es: Recopiladores de datos
fr: Terminaux de collecte de données
it: Terminali di raccolta dati
ja: データ収集端末
nl: Gegevensverzamelingsapparaten
no: Dataterminaler
pl: Kolektory danych
pt: Coletores de dados
ru: Терминалы сбора данных
sv: Terminaler för datainsamling
tr: Veri Toplama Terminalleri

en: E-Book Readers
xx: E-Book Readers
cs: Čtečky elektronických knih
da: E-bogslæsere
de: E-Book-Reader
es: Libros electrónicos
fr: Liseuses
it: E-Book reader
ja: 電子書籍リーダー
nl: E-boeklezers
no: Lesebrett
pl: Czytniki e-booków
pt: Leitores de e-books
ru: Электронные книги
sv: E-boksläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucular

en: PDAs
xx: PDAs
cs: PDA
da: PDA'er
de: PDAs
es: PDA
fr: PDA
it: PDA
ja: PDA
nl: PDA's
no: PDA-er
pl: Urządzenia PDA
pt: PDAs
ru: КПК
sv: Handdatorer
tr: PDAlar

en: Interactive Kiosks
xx: Interactive Kiosks
cs: Interaktivní kiosky
da: Interaktive terminaler
de: Interaktive Kioske
es: Kioscos interactivos
fr: Bornes interactives
it: Chioschi interattivi
ja: キオスク端末
nl: Interactieve kiosken
no: Interaktive kiosker
pl: Infokioski
pt: Quiosques interativos
ru: Интерактивные киоски
sv: Interaktiva kiosker
tr: İnteraktif Kiosklar

en: Laptops
xx: Laptops
cs: Notebooky
da: Bærbare computere
de: Laptops
es: Ordenadores portátiles
fr: Ordinateurs portables
it: Computer portatili
ja: ノートPC
nl: Laptops
no: Bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Laptopy
pt: Laptops
ru: Ноутбуки
sv: Bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayarlar

en: Smart Glasses
xx: Smart Glasses
cs: Chytré brýle
da: Smartglasses
de: Datenbrillen
es: Gafas inteligentes
fr: Lunettes intelligentes
it: Smart Glass
ja: スマート グラス
nl: Smartbrillen
no: Smartbriller
pl: Okulary typu „smart glasses”
pt: Óculos inteligentes
ru: Цифровые очки
sv: Smarta glasögon
tr: Akıllı Gözlükler

en: Smart speaker
fr: Enceinte connectée

en: Tablet Computers, Digital tablets
xx: Tablet Computers
cs: Tablety
da: Tabletcomputere
de: Tablet-PCs
es: Tablets
fr: Tablettes multimédias, Tablettes numériques, tablette numérique, Tablette tactile
it: Computer tablet
ja: タブレットPC
nl: Tabletcomputers
no: Nettbrett
pl: Tablety
pt: Computadores tablet
ru: Планшетные ПК
sv: Surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayarlar

en: Thin & Zero Clients
xx: Thin & Zero Clients
cs: Tencí a nuloví klienti
da: Tynde klienter og nulklienter
de: Thin Clients & Zero Clients
es: Clientes livianos y delgados
fr: Clients légers et zéro
it: Thin client e zero client
ja: シンクライアント・ゼロクライアント
nl: Thin- en zeroclients
no: Tynn- og nullklienter
pl: Komputery typu cienki klient i zerowy klient
pt: Thin clients e zero clients
ru: Тонкие и нулевые клиенты
sv: Tunna klienter och nollklienter
tr: Thin ve Zero Client'lar

en: Thin Client Computers
xx: Thin Client Computers
cs: Tenké klienty
da: Tynde klientcomputere
de: Thin Client-Computer
es: Ordenadores de cliente ligero
fr: Ordinateurs clients légers
it: Computer thin client
ja: シンクライアントコンピュータ
nl: Thin clients
no: Tynnklientmaskiner
pl: Cienkie klienty
pt: Computadores thin client
ru: Тонкие клиенты
sv: Tunna klienter
tr: İnce İstemci Bilgisayarları

en: Zero Client Computers
xx: Zero Client Computers
cs: Nulové klienty
da: Zero-klientcomputere
de: Zero Client-Computer
es: Ordenadores de cliente cero
fr: Ordinateurs clients zéro
it: Computer zero client
ja: ゼロクライアントコンピュータ
nl: Zero clients
no: Nullklientmaskiner
pl: Zerowe klienty
pt: Computadores zero clients
ru: Нулевые клиенты
sv: Nollklienter
tr: Sıfır İstemci Bilgisayarları